Utah statutes.
4-25-7.   County legislative body authorized to adopt fence ordinance  --
Lawful fence to be specified by ordinance -- Dividing the county into
divisions for different fencing regulations.
(1)  A county legislative body may, by ordinance, declare and enforce a
general policy within the county for the fencing of farms, subdivisions, or
other private property, to allow domestic animals to graze without trespassing
on farms, subdivisions, or other private property.
(2)  If an ordinance is adopted under Subsection (1), the county legislative
body:
(a)  shall through ordinance declare and specify what constitutes a lawful
fence; and
(b)  may divide the county into divisions and prescribe different fencing
regulations for each division.
